Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1810
Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority; created.

There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be known as the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority. The authority is constituted a public instrumentality, and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function of the state.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 10.